Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3206
County assessor in counties over 200,000 population; deputies.

In counties having a population of over two hundred thousand, the county assessor shall have two chief deputies, a chief field deputy and a chief office deputy.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 22, p. 392;

Laws 1905, c. 110, § 1, p. 509;

Laws 1909, c. 111, § 1, p. 436;

Laws 1913, c. 87, § 1, p. 229;

R.S.1913, § 2451;

Laws 1917, c. 46, § 1, p. 129;

Laws 1919, c. 61, § 1, p. 168;

C.S.1922, § 2390;

C.S.1929, § 33-129;

Laws 1931, c. 69, § 1, p. 188;

Laws 1941, c. 65, § 1, p. 289;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-129;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 21, p. 307;

R.S.1943, § 33-129;

Laws 1957, c. 133, § 1, p. 449;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 33-129;

Laws 1989, LB 5, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1989, § 77-401.02;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 21.